Connecticut, session 2026, HB05458.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 21a-420b of the general statutes is amended by
2 adding subsection (f) as follows (Effective October 1, 2026):
3 (NEW) (f) Neither the Division of State Police within the Department
4 of Emergency Services and Public Protection nor any municipal police
5 department shall accept a federal grant to conduct any program related
6 to the surveillance of, search for or destruction of cannabis grown on
7 private land.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 21a-420b(f)
sHB5458 / File No. 330 1

sHB5458 File No. 330
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
Subsec. (f) was rewritten for clarity.
PS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5458 / File No. 330 2

sHB5458 File No. 330
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
This bill, which is not expected to result in a fiscal impact, prohibits
the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection (DESPP)
and municipal police departments from accepting federal grants related
to cannabis grown on private property. Neither DESPP nor municipal
police departments currently have or anticipate federal grants for the
purposes prohibited under the bill.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sHB5458 / File No. 330 3

sHB5458 File No. 330
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5458
AN ACT PROHIBITING THE DIVISION OF STATE POLICE AND
MUNICIPAL POLICE DEPARTMENTS FROM ACCEPTING CERTAIN
FEDERAL GRANTS RELATED TO CANNABIS GROWN ON
PRIVATE LAND.